Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-602. Report of treatment required.

All physicians, surgeons, hospitals, druggists, or other persons or entities that render first aid treatment to a person shall report as provided in subsection (b) of this section if they treat or receive in the hospital a case of a:

Knife or gunshot wound when the knife or gunshot wound appears to have been intentionally inflicted; or

Burn wound that could reasonably be connected to criminal activity that is:

A second or third degree burn to five percent (5%) or more of a person's body; or

A burn to a person's upper respiratory tract or laryngeal edema due to the inhalation of super-heated air.

The reporting requirements of this subchapter are satisfied if:

The report is made to the county sheriff;

Within a city of the first class, the report is made to the municipal law enforcement agency; or

The report is made under subdivision (a)(2) of this section to the local fire marshal, fire chief, assistant fire chief, or an officer of the fire department having jurisdiction.

A physician, surgeon, hospital, druggist, or other person or entity required to report under this section that, in good faith, makes a report under this section has immunity from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed with respect to the making of a report under this section.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment, in (a), deleted “whether public or private, and all” preceding “druggists,” substituted “persons or entities” for “persons,” and “render” for “might be called upon to render,” inserted “to the office of the sheriff of the county,” substituted “when the” for “which” and deleted “to the office of the sheriff of the county or to one of his or her regular commissioned deputies” at the end.

The 2011 amendment subdivided (a) into (a)(1) and (a)(2); in the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “to a person” and substituted “as provided in subsection (b) of this section if they treat or receive in the hospital a case of a” for “to the office of the county sheriff of the county all cases of”; substituted “wound when the knife or gunshot wound appears” for “wounds treated by them or received in the hospital when the wounds appear” in (a)(1); added (a)(2); rewrote (b); and added (c).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Breanna Trombley, Note: Criminal Law — No Stitches for Snitches: The Need for a Duty-to-Report Law in Arkansas, 34 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 813 (2012).

Cited: Baker v. State, 276 Ark. 193, 637 S.W.2d 522 (1982).

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 342, § 5: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 10, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that existing law regulating the use and operation of devices or instruments designed to test or question individuals for the purpose of verifying the truth of statement is unduly restrictive and works a great hardship on the law enforcement agencies of this state; that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to promote and encourage the more efficient enforcement of the criminal laws of this State; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 1949, No. 258, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-501; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 33; 2011, No. 270, § 1.

12-12-603. Contents and time of report.

The report shall be made immediately upon the nature of the injury being ascertained, shall be by telephone if possible and practicable, otherwise by writing, and shall contain the name, age, sex, race, and location of the person so injured, together with names of persons bringing the patient in for treatment, if any.

A written report under this subchapter shall not be in compliance unless speedier means of transmitting the notice are not available, are impractical, or are incapable of reaching an officer.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 258, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-502.

Subchapter 7

— Psychological Stress Tests

12-12-701. Authorization.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Polygraph Examiners Licensing Act, §17-39-101 et seq., all law enforcement agencies in this state are authorized to use a psychological stress evaluation instrument to test or question individuals for the purpose of determining and verifying the truth of statements.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 342, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-901.

12-12-702. Warnings.

Prior to administering any psychological evaluation tests, the person to whom the test is administered must be warned prior to any questioning that:

He or she has a right to remain silent;

Anything he or she says can be used against him or her in a court of law;

He or she has the right to the presence of an attorney; and

If he or she cannot afford an attorney, one may be appointed for him or her prior to his or her questioning if he or she so desires.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 342, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-902.

12-12-703. Minors.

No psychological stress evaluation shall be given to any person under eighteen (18) years of age without first having received written authorization from the parent or guardian of the individual.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 342, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-904.

12-12-704. Results inadmissible.

The results of any such examination as provided in this subchapter shall be inadmissible in all courts in this state.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 342, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-903.

Subchapter 8

— Missing Children

12-12-801. Report of missing child — Notation on records.

When either a law enforcement officer or the Attorney General is notified by the parents, guardian, or other person having custody of a child that the child is missing, the law enforcement officer or the Attorney General shall:

Ensure that the missing child information is entered into the Missing Persons Information Clearinghouse within the Arkansas Crime Information Center under § 12-12-205 and the National Crime Information Center; and

Within five (5) business days after being notified by the parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child, inform by certified mail, return receipt requested, the Division of Vital Records of the Department of Health and the superintendent or school administrator of the school where the child was attending that the child has been reported as missing.

The division shall enter on or attach to the child's birth certificate a notice that the child has been reported missing. The school the child was attending shall make or attach the same notation on the child's school records.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment subdivided part of (a); inserted (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “notified by the parents, guardian, or other person having custody of the child” for “so notified” and inserted “or school administrator”; and inserted “the child was attending” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. Former subchapter 9, concerning the Habitual Child Sex Offender Registration Act, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 989, § 23. The former subchapter was derived from the following sources:

12-12-901. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 1.

12-12-902. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 2.

12-12-903. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 10.

12-12-904. Acts 1987, No. 587, §§ 3, 6.

12-12-905. Acts 1987, No. 587, §§ 4, 5.

12-12-906. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 7.

12-12-907. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 8.

12-12-908. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 7.

12-12-909. Acts 1987, No. 587, § 9.

Cross References. Juvenile sex offender assessment and registration, §9-27-356.

Restrictions on registered sex offenders, §§5-14-128 —5-14-134.

Status as a registered sex offender, §12-12-1513.

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 1353, § 20: July 1, 1999, and Sept. 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the need to register sex or child offenders or sexually violent predators is necessary to ensure the safety of the citizens of Arkansas. Currently, some sex or child offenders or sexually violent predators do not fall within the provisions of the current law and are therefore not required to be registered. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on September 1, 1999. Section 15 and Section 17 of this act shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 11: Apr. 7, 2006. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the need to register sex offenders and update the registration files of sex offenders is necessary to ensure the safety of the citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the provisions of this act will improve the process of registering sex offenders and updating the registration files of sex offenders; and that this act is immediately necessary because of the public risk posed by sex offenders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2007, No. 394, § 11: Mar. 21, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the need to register and verify registration of sex offenders and sexually violent predators is necessary to ensure the safety of the citizens of the State of Arkansas; that the provisions of this act will improve the process of registering and verifying the registration of sex offenders and sexually violent predators; and that this act is necessary because of the public risk posed by sex offenders and sexually violent predators. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 164, § 1; 1993, No. 116, § 1; 2011, No. 598, § 1.

12-12-802. Request for birth certificate — Notification of law enforcement officer or Attorney General.

When the Division of Vital Records of the Department of Health receives a request for the birth certificate of a child who has been reported missing pursuant to this subchapter, the division shall within five (5) business days after receipt of the inquiry notify the law enforcement officer or the Attorney General, whoever initiated the report to the division, and furnish the name, address, and telephone number, if known, of the person making the inquiry.

The notice to the law enforcement officer or the Attorney General shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 164, § 1; 1993, No. 116, § 2.

12-12-803. Request for school records — Notification of law enforcement officer or Attorney General.

When a school receives a request for the records of a child who has been reported missing, the school shall, within five (5) business days, excluding days when the school is closed, after receipt of the inquiry, notify the law enforcement officer or the Attorney General and furnish the name, address, and telephone number, if known, of the person making the inquiry.

The notice shall be by certified mail, return receipt requested.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 164, § 1; 1993, No. 116, § 3.

Subchapter 9

— Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997

12-12-901. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 1; 2001, No. 1743, § 1.

12-12-902. Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that sex offenders pose a high risk of reoffending after release from custody, that protecting the public from sex offenders is a primary governmental interest, that the privacy interest of persons adjudicated guilty of sex offenses is less important than the government's interest in public safety, and that the release of certain information about sex offenders to criminal justice agencies and the general public will assist in protecting the public safety.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 2.